District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Universal Paid Leave Portability Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C.
Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01(6)(A)), is amended to read as follows:
(a) Section 101 (D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01(6)(A)), is amended to read as follows:
“(A) Has been a covered employee during some or all of the 52 calendar
weeks immediately preceding the qualifying event for which paid leave is being taken and:
“(i) Is presently employed by a covered employer; or


“(ii) Is unemployed and is not receiving benefits pursuant to the
District of Columbia Unemployment Compensation Amendment Act, effective August 28, 1935
(49 Stat. 946; D.C. Official Code § 51-101 et seq.); or”.”
(b) Section 107(e) (D.C. Official Code § 32-541.07(e)) is amended to read as follows:
“(e) An individual who receives benefits pursuant to the District of Columbia
Unemployment Compensation Amendment Act, effective August 28, 1935 (49 Stat. 946; D.C.
47 Official Code § 51-101 et seq.), shall not be eligible to receive the benefits provided for in
this act for the same period of time.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
Mayor, action by the Council to override veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1–206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.